District of Columbia statutes.
42-3651.01

Purpose of the appointment of a receiver.

The purpose of the appointment of a receiver under this chapter shall be to safeguard the health, safety, and security of the tenants of a rental housing accommodation if there exists a violation of District of Columbia or federal law which seriously threatens the tenant’s health, safety, or security. The receiver shall not take actions inconsistent with this purpose or take actions other than those necessary and proper to the maintenance and repair of the rental housing accommodation. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to limit or abrogate any other common law or statutory right to petition for receivership.

Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-281, § 501, 48 DCR 1888
Delegation of Authority Under D.C. Law 13-281, the “Abatement and Condemnation of Nuisance Property Omnibus Amendment Act of 2002”, see Mayor’s Order 2002-33, March 1, 2002 ( 49 DCR 1875).
Section 601 of D.C. Law 13-281 provided: “The Mayor may issue rules to implement the Abatement and Condemnation of Nuisance Properties Omnibus Amendment Act of 2000 in accordance with the District of Columbia Administrative Procedure Act.”